Utah statutes.
7-16a-201.   Authority to operate an automated teller machine.

An automated teller machine located in this state shall be operated only by:

(1)  a depository institution;

(2)  a depository institution holding company; or

(3)  an institution directly or indirectly owned or controlled by one or more depository institutions or depository institution holding companies.

